Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.100

Amount due reflects cost of education and transportation of students.

Unless otherwise agreed to by the board of directors of a nonhigh school district, the amounts which are established as due by a nonhigh school district pursuant to RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and 84.52.0531, as now or hereafter amended, shall constitute the entire amount which is due by a nonhigh school district for the school year for the education of any and all students with or without disabilities residing in the nonhigh school district who attend a high school district pursuant to RCW 28A.225.210, and for the transportation of such students by a high school district.

[ 1995 c 77 s 26; 1990 c 33 s 494; 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 7; 1981 c 264 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.44.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 61: See note following RCW 28A.160.010.

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.